Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 331.756, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 76. a. In the case of an officer-involved shooting resulting in the death or serious bodily injury of a person, review the evidence and render a written opinion and charging decision, convene a grand jury, or refer the case to the attorney general as provided in section 13.12. b. A written report detailing the results of the review specified in paragraph âaâ shall be provided to the officer involved or the officerâs legal counsel and the officerâs employing agency within one hundred eighty days of the county attorneyâs receipt of evidence. c. If the case presents a conflict of interest, the review shall be referred to an independent county attorney, the attorney general, or a special prosecutor. House File 549, p. 2 d. For the purposes of this subsection, âofficerâ means the same as defined in section 801.4, subsection 11. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 549, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor